DI-254

DIAGNOSTICS -

ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DIARL-01

DTC | c1243/43,Cc 1245/45 | MalfunctioninDeceleration Sensor
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
While vehicle speed becomes 0 km/h (0 mph) from 30 km/h

C1243 ) 43 (18 mph), and the condition that GL1 and GL2 signals of ECU
terminals did not change 40 mV or less continued in a
sequence 16 times.

* Deceleration sensor

Atthe vehicle speed of 30 km/h (18 mph) or more, and the Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
condition that the difference between acceleration and decel-

C1245/45 eration values of computation from deceleration sensorand
vehicle speed becomes more than 0.35 G continues for 60
sec. or more.

WIRING DIAGRAM
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-255
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Start the inspection from step 1 in case of using the hand-held tester and start from step 3 in case of not
using the hand-held tester.

1 Check output value of the yaw rate (deceleration) sensor.

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLC3.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch to ON and turn the hand-held tester main switch to ON.

(c) Select the DATALIST mode on the hand-held tester.

CHECK:

Check that the deceleration value of the deceleration sensor observed in the hand-held tester changes

when the vehicle is tilted.
0K> Go to step 3.

OK:
Deceleration value must be changing.

@

2 [ Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between yaw rate (de-
celeration) sensor and skid control ECU (See page IN-38).

@

Replace yaw rate sensor.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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3 | Check yaw rate (deceleration) sensor.
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PREPARATION:
(@ Connect 3 dry batteries of 1.5 V in series.
(b) Connect VYSterminaltothe batteries’ positive (+) termi-

nal,and GYAW terminalto the batteries’ negative ( -)ter-
minal. Apply about 4.5 V between VYS and GYAW termi-
nals.

NOTICE:

Do not apply voltage of 6 V or more to terminals VYS and
GYAW.

CHECK:

Check the output voltage of GL1 and GL2 terminals when the
sensor is tilted forward and rearward.

OK:
Symbols Condition Standard Value

GL1 Horizontal About 2.3 V
GL1 Leanrearward 1.0V -about2.3V
GL1 Lean forward About2.3V -3.5V
GL2 Horizontal About 2.3 V
GL2 Leanrearward About2.3V -3.5V
GL2 Lean forward 1.0V -about2.3V

HINT:

. Ifthe sensoristilted too much itmay showthe wrong val-
ue.

. Ifdropped, the sensor should be replaced withanew one.
«  Thesensorremovedfromthe vehicle should notbe
placed upside down.

NG> Replace yaw rate sensor.
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4 | Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between yaw rate (de-
celeration) sensor and skid control ECU (See page IN-38).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace skid control ECU.
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